Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1573.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Licensed child care facility” means a child care center certified under ORS 329A.280
that is operating under authority of a valid business license.
(b) “Syringe service program” means a program that provides services including free
sterile needles and syringes and safe disposal for needles and syringes.
(2) A syringe service program may not provide services from a mobile or temporary lo-
cation that is within 2,000 feet of the real property comprising an existing:
(a) Public or private elementary, secondary or career school attended primarily by mi-
nors; or
(b) Licensed child care facility.
(3)(a) Any person may bring an action to enforce the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section in the circuit court in the county in which a syringe service program operates.
(b) In an action under this subsection, there is a rebuttable presumption that discarded
needles, syringes or drug paraphernalia, as defined in ORS 475.525, found within 2,000 feet
of the real estate described in subsection (2) of this section were discarded from a syringe
service program operating in violation of subsection (2) of this section.
(c) A plaintiff who prevails in an action under this subsection may recover the greater
of:
(A) $5,000; or
(B) The actual damages incurred by the plaintiff to clean up the discarded items.
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to the plaintiff if the plaintiff prevails
in an action under this subsection.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 259